Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.160.040

Lease of buses to transport children with disabilities and elderly—Limitation.

The directors of school districts are authorized to lease school buses to nonprofit organizations to transport children with disabilities and elderly persons to and from the site of activities or programs deemed beneficial to such persons by such organizations: PROVIDED, That commercial bus transportation is not reasonably available for such purposes.

[ 1995 c 77 s 16; 1973 c 45 s 2; 1971 c 78 s 1. Formerly RCW 28A.24.110.]

NOTES:

Elderly persons defined—Program limitation: RCW 28A.160.070.